District of Columbia statutes.
38-608

Joint administration by Mayor and Board of Education; rules.

The Mayor and the Board of Education shall jointly administer this subchapter and each shall issue rules pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, to carry out its purposes.

Dec. 3, 1985, D.C. Law 6-66, § 9, 32 DCR 6086

History

This section is referenced in § 38-604.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 31-2408.

Prior Codifications